Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2703
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Perfusion Practice Act:

(1) Board means the Board of Medicine and Surgery;

(2) Extracorporeal circulation means the diversion of a patient's blood through a heart-lung machine or a similar device that assumes the functions of the patient's heart, lungs, kidney, liver, or other organs;

(3) Perfusion means the functions necessary for the support, treatment, measurement, or supplementation of the cardiovascular, circulatory, and respiratory systems or other organs, or a combination of such activities, and to ensure the safe management of physiologic functions by monitoring and analyzing the parameters of the systems under an order and under the supervision of a licensed physician, including:

(a) The use of extracorporeal circulation, long-term cardiopulmonary support techniques including extracorporeal carbon dioxide removal and extracorporeal membrane oxygenation, and associated therapeutic and diagnostic technologies;

(b) Counterpulsation, ventricular assistance, autotransfusion, blood conservation techniques, myocardial and organ preservation, extracorporeal life support, and isolated limb perfusion;

(c) The use of techniques involving blood management, advanced life support, and other related functions; and

(d) In the performance of the acts described in subdivisions (a) through (c) of this subdivision:

(i) The administration of:

(A) Pharmacological and therapeutic agents; and

(B) Blood products or anesthetic agents through the extracorporeal circuit or through an intravenous line as ordered by a physician;

(ii) The performance and use of:

(A) Anticoagulation monitoring and analysis;

(B) Physiologic monitoring and analysis;

(C) Blood gas and chemistry monitoring and analysis;

(D) Hematologic monitoring and analysis;

(E) Hypothermia and hyperthermia;

(F) Hemoconcentration and hemodilution; and

(G) Hemodialysis; and

(iii) The observation of signs and symptoms related to perfusion services, the determination of whether the signs and symptoms exhibit abnormal characteristics, and the implementation of appropriate reporting, clinical perfusion protocols, or changes in, or the initiation of, emergency procedures; and

(4) Perfusionist means a person who is licensed to practice perfusion pursuant to the Perfusion Practice Act.

Laws 2007, LB236, § 10;

R.S.Supp.,2007, § 71-1,392;

Laws 2017, LB644, § 5.